New Jersey, session 221, S663.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Upon the request of a person who has been diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder by a physician, psychologist, or any other health care professional licensed pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes and authorized to provide such diagnosis, or upon the request of the guardian or caregiver of the person, the Division of Developmental Disabilities within the Department of Human Services shall issue a certification card denoting that the person has been medically diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder. The certification card, along with the persons drivers license or State-issued non-driver identification card as necessary, may be presented to a law enforcement officer or emergency medical service provider for the purposes of assisting the law enforcement officer or emergency medical service provider in identifying and effectively communicating with the person. b.    The certification card, issued pursuant to subsection a. of this section, shall explain that the person has been diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder, may have difficulty communicating or understanding directions, and may become agitated when physically touched or in stressful situations. The certification card shall also provide the emergency contact information of a person who can confirm the cardholders diagnosis and a person who can communicate on behalf of the cardholder. c.     The division shall establish the documentation required to be produced by a person who has been diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder, or by the guardian or caregiver of the person, in order to receive a certification card issued pursuant to subsection a.  The division may collect a reasonable fee for the issuance of the certification card, which shall not be greater than the cost to issue the certification card. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month following enactment.